Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2715
Association; exempt from fees and taxes; exception.

The association shall be exempt from payment of all fees and all taxes levied by this state or any of its subdivisions, except taxes levied on real property.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 15.